California statutes. Corporations Code
(c) Whenever the articles require for corporate action the approval of a particular class of members or of a larger proportion of, or all of, the votes of any class, or of a larger proportion of, or all of, the directors, than is otherwise required by this part, the provision in the articles requiring a greater vote shall not be altered, amended or repealed except by the class or the greater vote, unless otherwise provided in the articles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 538, Sec. 9.   (AB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

12503.

(a) An amendment shall also be approved by the members (Section 12224) of a class, whether or not the class is entitled to vote thereon by the provisions of the articles, if the amendment would do any of the following:

(1) Materially and adversely affect the rights, privileges, preferences, restrictions or conditions of that class as to voting, dissolution, redemption or transfer, or the obligations of that class, in a manner different than such action affects another class.

(2) Materially and adversely affect such class as to voting, dissolution, redemption or transfer by changing the rights,
 privileges, preferences, restrictions or conditions of another
 class.

(3) Increase the number of memberships authorized for the class.

(4) Increase the number of memberships authorized for another
 class.

(5) Effect an exchange, reclassification or cancellation of all or part of the memberships of the class.

(6) Authorize a new class of memberships.

(b) An amendment shall also be approved by the members of a series whether or not the series is entitled to vote thereon by the articles or bylaws if the series is adversely affected by the amendment in a different manner than other shares of the same class.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 538, Sec. 10.   (AB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

12504.

(a) A corporation may amend its articles to change its status to that of a nonprofit public benefit corporation, a nonprofit mutual benefit corporation, a nonprofit religious corporation, a business corporation, or a social purpose corporation by complying with this section and the other sections of this chapter.

(b) Except as authorized by Section 12501 or unless the corporation has no members, an amendment to change its status to a nonprofit public benefit corporation or a nonprofit religious corporation shall: (1) be approved by the members (Section 12224), and the fairness of the amendment to the members shall be approved by the Commissioner of Financial Protection and
 Innovation pursuant to Section 25142; or (2) be approved by the members (Section 12224) in an election conducted by written ballot pursuant to Section 12463 in which no negative votes are cast; or (3) be approved by 100 percent of the voting power.

(c) Amended articles authorized by this section shall include the provisions which would have been required (other than the initial street address and initial mailing address of the corporation and the name of the initial agent for service of process if a statement has been filed pursuant to Section 12570), and may in addition only include those provisions which would have been permitted, in original articles filed by the type of corporation (nonprofit public benefit, nonprofit mutual benefit, nonprofit religious, business, or social purpose) into which the corporation is changing
 its status.

(d) At the time of filing a certificate of amendment to change status to a nonprofit public benefit corporation, the Secretary of State shall make available the filed certificate to the Attorney General.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 82.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

12505.

(a) Upon adoption of an amendment, the corporation shall file a certificate of amendment, which shall consist of an officers’ certificate stating:

(1) The wording of the amendment or amended articles is in accordance with Section 12507;

(2) That the amendment has been approved by the board;

(3) If the amendment is one for which the approval of the members (Section 12224) or the approval of 100 percent of the voting power is required, that the amendment was approved by the required vote of members; and

(4) If the amendment is one which may be adopted with approval by the board alone, a statement of the facts entitling the board alone to adopt the amendment. 

(b) In the event of an amendment of the articles pursuant to a merger, the filing of the officers’ certificate and agreement pursuant to Section 12535 shall be in lieu of any filing required under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12506.

In the case of amendments adopted by the incorporators under Section 12501, the corporation shall file a certificate of amendment signed and verified by a majority of the incorporators which shall state that the signers thereof constitute at least a majority of the incorporators, that directors were not named in the original articles and have not been elected, that the corporation has no members and that they adopt the amendment or amendments therein set forth.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12507.

The certificate of amendment shall establish the wording of the amendment or amended articles by one or more of the following means:

(a) By stating that the articles shall be amended to read as therein set forth in full.

(b) By stating that any provision of the articles, which shall be identified by the numerical or other designation given it in the articles or by stating the wording thereof, shall be striken from the articles or shall be amended to read as set forth in the certificate.

(c) By stating that the provisions set forth therein shall be added to the articles.

If the purpose of the amendment is to reclassify, cancel, exchange, or otherwise change outstanding memberships the amended articles shall state the effect thereof on outstanding memberships.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12508.

Upon the filing of the certificate of amendment, the articles shall be amended in accordance with the certificate and any change, reclassification or cancellation of memberships shall be effected, and a copy of the certificate, certified by the Secretary of State, is prima facie evidence of the performance of the conditions necessary to the adoption of the amendment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12509.

A corporation formed for a limited period may at any time subject to the expiration of the term of its corporate existence, extend the term of its existence by an amendment to its articles removing any provision limiting the term of its existence and providing for perpetual existence. If the filing of the certificate of amendment providing for perpetual existence would be prohibited if it were original articles by the provisions of Section 12302, the Secretary of State shall not file such certificate unless, by the same or a concurrently filed certificate of amendment, the articles of such corporation are amended to adopt a new available name. For the purpose of the adoption of any such amendment, persons who have been functioning as directors of such corporation shall be considered to have been validly elected even though their election may have occurred after the expiration of the original term of the corporate existence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12510.

(a) A corporation may restate in a single certificate the entire text of its articles as amended by filing an officers’ certificate entitled “Restated Articles of Incorporation of (insert name of corporation)” which shall set forth the articles as amended to the date of filing of the certificate, except that the signatures and acknowledgments of the incorporators and any statements regarding the effect of any prior amendment upon memberships and any provisions of agreements of merger (other than amendments to the articles of the surviving corporation) and the names, addresses, signatures and acknowledgments of the first directors and the initial street address and initial mailing address of the corporation
 and of the initial agent for service of process shall be omitted (except that the initial street address and initial mailing address of the corporation and the names and addresses of the initial agent for service of process and the first directors shall not be omitted prior to the time that the corporation has filed a statement under Section 12570). Such omissions are not alterations or amendments of the articles. The certificate may also itself alter or amend the articles in any respect, in which case the certificate must comply with Sections 12505 and 12506, as the case may be, and Section 12507.

(b) If the certificate does not itself alter or amend the articles in any respect, it shall be approved by the board and shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter relating to an amendment of the articles not requiring approval of the
 members (Section 12224). If the certificate does itself alter or amend the articles, it shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter relating to the amendment or amendments so made.

(c) Restated articles of incorporation filed pursuant to this section shall supersede for all purposes the original articles and all amendments filed prior thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 494, Sec. 32.   (SB 1532)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Sales of Assets [12520. - 12522.]

12520.

Any mortgage, deed of trust, pledge or other hypothecation of all or any part of the corporation’s property, real or personal, for the purpose of securing the payment or performance of any contract or obligation may be approved by the board. Unless the articles or bylaws otherwise provide, no approval of the members (Section 12224) shall be necessary for such action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12521.

(a) A corporation may sell, lease, convey, exchange, transfer or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of its assets when the principal terms are:

(1) Approved by the board; and

(2) Unless the transaction is in the usual and regular course of its activities approved by the members (Section 12224) either before or after approval by the board and before or after the transaction.

(b) Notwithstanding approval by the members (Section 12224), the board may abandon the proposed transaction without further action by the members, subject to the contractual rights, if any, of third parties.

(c) Such sale, lease, conveyance, exchange, transfer or other disposition may be made upon such terms and conditions and for such consideration as the board may deem in the best interests of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12522.

Any deed or instrument conveying or otherwise transferring any assets of a corporation may have annexed to it the certificate of the secretary or an assistant secretary of the corporation, setting forth that the transaction has been validly approved by the board and (a) stating that the property described in such deed or instrument is less than substantially all of the assets of the corporation or that the transfer is in the usual and regular course of the business of the corporation, if such be the case, or (b) if such property constitutes all or substantially all of the assets of the corporation and the transfer is not in the usual and regular course of the business of the corporation, stating the fact of approval thereof by the members (Section 12224) or all the members pursuant to this chapter. Such certificate is prima facie evidence of the existence of the facts authorizing such conveyance or other transfer of the assets and conclusive evidence in favor of any purchaser or encumbrancer for value who, without notice of any trust restriction applicable to the property or any failure to comply therewith, in good faith parted with value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Mergers [12530. - 12552.]



  ARTICLE 1. Merger [12530. - 12540.1.]

12530.

Except as provided in Section 12530.5, any corporation may merge with another domestic corporation, foreign corporation, or other business entity. However, a merger with a nonprofit public benefit corporation or a nonprofit religious corporation must have the prior written consent of the Attorney General.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 192, Sec. 22.   (AB 816)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

12530.5.

Notwithstanding Section 12530, a worker cooperative that has not revoked its election to be governed as a worker cooperative under Section 12310.5 shall not consolidate or merge with another corporation other than another worker cooperative. Two or more worker cooperatives may merge or consolidate in a manner consistent with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 192, Sec. 23.   (AB 816)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

12531.

The board of each corporation that desires to merge shall approve an agreement of merger. The constituent corporations shall be parties to the agreement of merger and other persons may be parties to the agreement of merger. The agreement shall state all of the following:

(a) The terms and conditions of the merger.

(b) The amendments, subject to Sections 12500 and 12505 to the articles of the surviving corporation to be effected by the merger, if any; if any amendment changes the name of the surviving corporation, the new name may be the same as or similar to the name of a disappearing corporation, subject to subdivision (c) of Section 12302.

(c) The amendments to the bylaws of the surviving corporation to be effected by the merger, if any.

(d) The name and place of incorporation of each constituent corporation and which of the constituent corporations is the surviving corporation.

(e) The manner, if any, of converting memberships or securities of the constituent corporations into memberships or securities of the surviving corporation and, if any memberships or securities of any of the constituent corporations are not to be converted solely into memberships or securities of the surviving corporation, the cash, property, rights or securities of any corporation that the holders of those memberships or securities are to receive in exchange for the memberships or securities, which cash, property, rights or securities of any corporation may be in addition to or in lieu of memberships or securities of the surviving corporation or that the memberships are to be canceled without consideration.

(f) Other details or provisions as are desired, if any, including, without limitation, if not prohibited by this chapter, a provision for the payment of cash in lieu of fractional memberships or for any other arrangement with respect thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 453, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

12532.

Each membership of the same class of any constituent corporation (other than the cancellation of memberships held by a surviving corporation or its parent or a wholly owned subsidiary of either in a constituent corporation) shall be treated equally with respect to any distribution of cash, property, rights, or securities unless: (a) all members of the class consent or (b) the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation has approved the terms and conditions of the transaction and the fairness of such terms pursuant to Section 25142.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 60.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

12533.

(a) The principal terms of the merger shall be approved by the members (Section 12224) of each class of each corporation which desires to merge. The approval by the members may be given before or after the approval by the board. 

(b) Any member of any constituent corporation who voted against the merger may, without prior notice, but within 30 days following the effective date of the merger, resign from membership and, in the event of resignation, shall be:

(1) Thereafter excused from all contractual obligations to the corporation which have not accrued prior to resignation; and

(2) Shall be entitled to the same rights as would have existed if there had been no merger and the membership had been terminated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12534.

Each constituent corporation shall sign the agreement by the chairperson of its board, president or a vice president and secretary or an assistant secretary acting on behalf of their respective corporations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 83.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

12535.

After approval of a merger by the board and any approval by the members under Section 12533, the surviving corporation shall file a copy of the agreement of merger with an officers’ certificate of each constituent corporation attached stating the total number of memberships of each class entitled to vote on the merger, and that the principal terms of the agreement in the form attached were duly approved by the required vote of the members. The merger and any amendment of the articles of the surviving corporation contained in the merger agreement shall thereupon be effective (subject to subdivision (c) of Section 12214 and subject to the provisions of Section 12539) and the several parties thereto shall be one corporation. The Secretary of State may certify a copy of the merger agreement separate from the officers’ certificates attached thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 773, Sec. 29.   Effective September 29, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

12536.

(a) Any amendment to the agreement may be adopted and the agreement so amended may be approved by the board and, if it changes any of the principal terms of the agreement, by the members, as required by Section 12533 of any constituent corporation in the same manner as the original agreement.

(b) If the agreement so amended is approved as provided in subdivision (a), the agreement so amended shall then constitute the agreement of merger.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12537.

The board may, in its discretion, abandon a merger, subject to the contractual rights, if any, of third parties, including other constituent corporations, without further approval by the members at any time before the merger is effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12538.

A copy of an agreement of merger certified on or after the effective date by an official having custody thereof has the same force in evidence as the original and, except as against the state, is conclusive evidence of the performance of all conditions precedent to the merger, the existence on the effective date of the surviving corporation, and the performance of the conditions necessary to the adoption of any amendment to the articles contained in the agreement of merger.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12539.

(a) Subject to the provisions of Section 12530, the merger of any number of corporations with any number of foreign corporations, foreign business corporations, or domestic corporations may be effected if the foreign corporations are authorized by the laws under which they are formed to effect the merger. The surviving corporation may be any one of the constituent corporations and shall continue to exist under the laws of the state or place of its incorporation.

(b) If the surviving corporation is a cooperative corporation, the merger proceedings with respect to that corporation and any domestic disappearing corporation shall conform to the provisions of this chapter and other applicable laws of this state, but if the surviving corporation is a foreign corporation, then, subject to the requirements of subdivision (d) and Section 12533, the merger proceedings may be in accordance with the laws of the state or place of incorporation of the surviving corporation.

(c) If the surviving corporation is a cooperative corporation, the agreement and the officers’ certificate of each constituent corporation shall be filed as provided in Section 12535 and thereupon, subject to subdivision (c) of Section 12214, the merger shall be effective as to each corporation; and each foreign disappearing corporation that is qualified for the transaction of intrastate business shall, by virtue of the filing, automatically surrender its right to transact intrastate business.

(d) If the surviving corporation is a foreign corporation, the merger shall become effective in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction in which it is organized, but shall be effective as to any disappearing corporation as of the time of effectiveness in the foreign jurisdiction upon the filing in this state as required by this subdivision. There shall be filed as to the domestic disappearing corporation or corporations the documents described in any one of the following paragraphs:

(1) A copy of the agreement, certificate, or other document filed by the surviving corporation in the state or place of its incorporation for the purpose of effecting the merger, which copy shall be certified by the public officer having official custody of the original.

(2) An executed counterpart of the agreement, certificate, or other document filed by the surviving corporation in the state or place of its incorporation for the purpose of effecting the merger.

(3) A copy of the agreement of merger with an officers’ certificate of the surviving foreign corporation and of each constituent domestic corporation attached.

(e) If the date of the filing in this state pursuant to subdivision (d) is more than six months after the time of the effectiveness in the foreign jurisdiction, or if the powers of the domestic corporation are suspended at the time of effectiveness in the foreign jurisdiction, the merger shall be effective as to the domestic disappearing corporation or corporations as of the date of filing in this state. Each foreign disappearing corporation that is qualified for the transaction of intrastate business shall automatically by the filing pursuant to subdivision (d) surrender its right to transact intrastate business as of the date of the filing in this state regardless of the time of effectiveness as to a domestic disappearing corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 773, Sec. 30.   Effective September 29, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

12540.

If an agreement of merger is entered into between a cooperative corporation and one or more business or nonprofit corporations, Sections 12531, 12532, 12533, 12535, and 12536 shall apply to any constituent cooperative corporation. Sections 8011, 8011.5, 8012, and 8015 shall apply to any constituent mutual benefit corporation. Sections 6011, 6012, 6014, and 6015 shall apply to any constituent public benefit corporation. Sections 6014 and 6015 and subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 9640 shall apply to any constituent religious corporation and Sections 1101, 1101.1, 1103, and 1104 shall apply to any constituent business corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12540.1.

(a) Any one or more corporations may merge with one or more other business entities (Section 12242.5). Subject to the provisions of Section 12530, one or more other domestic corporations or foreign corporations (Section 12237) may be parties to the merger.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, such a merger may be effected only if:

(1) In a merger in which a domestic corporation or domestic other business entity is a party, it is authorized by the laws under which it is organized to effect the merger.

(2) In a merger in which a foreign
 corporation is a party, it is authorized by the laws under which it is organized to effect the merger.

(3) In a merger in which a foreign other business entity is a party, it is authorized by the laws under which it is organized to effect the merger.

(b) Each corporation, other domestic corporation, foreign corporation, and other business entity which desires to merge shall approve an agreement of merger. The board and the members of each corporation which desires to merge shall approve (Sections 12222 and 12224) the agreement of merger. The agreement of merger shall be approved on behalf of each other constituent party by those persons authorized or required to approve the merger by the laws under which it is organized.

The
 parties desiring to merge shall be parties to the agreement of merger and other persons, including a parent party (Section 12242.6), may be parties to the agreement of merger. The
 agreement of merger shall state all of the following:

(1) The terms and conditions of the merger.

(2) The name and place of incorporation or organization of each party and the identity of the surviving party.

(3) The amendments, if any, subject to Sections 12500 and 12507, to the articles of the surviving corporation, if applicable, to be effected by the merger. The name of the surviving corporation may be, subject to subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 12302, the same as, or similar to, the name of a disappearing party to the merger.

(4) The manner, if any, of converting the memberships or securities of each of the constituent corporations into
 shares, memberships, interests, or other securities of the surviving party and, if any memberships or securities of any of the constituent corporations are not to be converted solely into shares, memberships, interests, or other securities of the surviving party, the cash, rights, securities, or other property which the holders of those memberships or securities are to receive in exchange for the memberships or securities, which cash, rights, securities, or other property may be in addition to or in lieu of shares, memberships, interests, or other securities of the surviving party.

(5) Any other details or provisions required by the laws under which any party to the merger is organized, including, if a domestic limited partnership is a party to the merger, subdivision (a) of Section 15911.12, or, if a domestic general partnership is a party to
 the merger, subdivision (a) of Section 16911, or, if a domestic limited liability company is a party to the merger, subdivision (a) of Section 17710.12.

(6) Any other details or provisions as are desired.

(c) Each membership of the same class of any constituent corporation (other than the cancellation of memberships held by a party to the merger or its parent or a wholly owned subsidiary of either in another constituent corporation) shall be treated equally with respect to any distribution of cash, property, rights, or securities unless (i) all members of the class consent or (ii) the commissioner has approved the terms and conditions of the transaction and the fairness of those terms pursuant to Section 25142.

(d) Notwithstanding its prior approval, an agreement of merger may be amended prior to the filing of the agreement of merger if the amendment is approved by each constituent corporation in the same manner as the original agreement of merger. If the agreement of merger as so amended and approved is also approved by each of the other parties to the agreement of merger, as so amended it shall then constitute the agreement of merger.

(e) The board of a constituent corporation may, in its discretion, abandon a merger, subject to the contractual rights, if any, of third parties, including other parties to the agreement of merger, without further approval by the members (Section 12224), at any time before the merger is effective.

(f) Each constituent corporation shall sign
 the agreement of merger by its chairperson of the board, president, or a vice president and also by its secretary or an assistant secretary acting on behalf of their respective corporations.

(g) After required approvals of the merger by each constituent corporation and each other party to the merger, the surviving party shall file a copy of the agreement of merger with an officers’ certificate of each constituent domestic and foreign corporation attached stating the total number of outstanding shares or membership interests of each class entitled to vote on the merger (and identifying any other person or persons whose approval is required), that the agreement of merger in the form attached or its principal terms, as required, were approved by that corporation by a vote of a number of shares or membership interests of each class which
 equaled or exceeded the vote required, specifying each class entitled to vote and the percentage vote required of each class, and, if applicable, by that other person or persons whose approval is required.

If equity securities of a parent party (Section 12242.6) are to be issued in the merger, the officers’ certificate or certificate of merger of the controlled party shall state either that no vote of the shareholders of the parent party was required or that the required vote was obtained. The merger and any amendment of the articles of the surviving corporation, if applicable, contained in the agreement of merger shall be effective upon the filing of the agreement of merger, subject to the provisions of subdivision (i). If a domestic reciprocal insurer organized after 1974 to provide medical malpractice insurance is a party to the merger, the agreement of
 merger or certificate of merger shall not be filed until there has been filed the certificate issued by the Insurance Commissioner approving the merger pursuant to Section 1555 of the Insurance Code.

In lieu of an officers’ certificate, a certificate of merger, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State, shall be filed for each constituent other business entity. The certificate of merger shall be executed and acknowledged by each domestic constituent limited liability company by all of the managers of the limited liability company (unless a lesser number is specified in its articles of organization or operating agreement) and by each domestic constituent limited partnership by all general partners (unless a lesser number is provided in its certificate of limited partnership or partnership agreement) and by each domestic constituent general partnership
 by two partners (unless a lesser number is provided in its partnership agreement) and by each foreign constituent general partnership or foreign constituent limited liability company by one or more managers and by each foreign constituent limited partnership by one or more general partners, and by each constituent reciprocal insurer by the chairperson of the board, president, or vice president, and by the secretary or assistant secretary, or, if a constituent reciprocal insurer has not appointed such officers, by the chairperson of the board, president, or vice president, and by the secretary or assistant secretary of the constituent reciprocal insurer’s attorney-in-fact, and by each other party to the merger by those persons required or authorized to execute the certificate of merger by the laws under which that party is organized, specifying for such party the provision of law or other basis for the
 authority of the signing persons.

The certificate of merger shall set forth, if a vote of the shareholders, members, partners, or other holders of interests of the constituent other business entity was required, a statement setting forth the total number of outstanding interests of each class entitled to vote on the merger and that the agreement of merger or its principal terms, as required, were approved by a vote of the number of interests of each class which equaled or exceeded the vote required, specifying each class entitled to vote and the percentage vote required of each class, and any other information required to be set forth under the laws under which the constituent other business entity is organized, including, if a domestic limited partnership is a party to the merger, subdivision (a) of Section 15911.14, if a domestic general partnership is a party
 to the merger, subdivision (b) of Section 16915, and, if a domestic limited liability company is a party to the merger, subdivision (a) of Section 17710.14. The certificate of merger for each constituent foreign other business entity, if any, shall also set forth the statutory or other basis under which that foreign other business entity is authorized by the laws under which it is organized to effect the merger.

The Secretary of State may certify a copy of the agreement of merger separate from the officers’ certificates and certificates of merger attached thereto.

(h) A copy of an agreement of merger certified on or after the effective date by an official having custody thereof has the same force in evidence as the original and, except as against the state, is conclusive evidence of the
 performance of all conditions precedent to the merger, the existence on the effective date of the surviving party to the merger, the performance of the conditions necessary to the adoption of any amendment to the articles, if applicable, contained in the agreement of merger, and of the merger of the constituent corporations, either by themselves or together with other constituent parties, into the surviving party to the merger.

(i) (1) The merger of domestic corporations with foreign corporations or foreign other business entities in a merger in which one or more other business entities is a party shall comply with subdivisions (a) and (g) and this subdivision.

(2) Subject to subdivision (c) of Section 12214 and paragraph (3), the merger shall be effective as
 to each domestic constituent corporation and domestic constituent other business entity upon filing of the agreement of merger with attachments as provided in subdivision (g).

(3) If the surviving party is a foreign corporation or foreign other business entity, except as provided in paragraph (4), the merger shall be effective as to any domestic disappearing corporation as of the time of effectiveness in the foreign jurisdiction upon the filing in this state of a copy of the agreement of merger with an officers’ certificate of the surviving foreign corporation and of each constituent foreign and domestic corporation and a certificate of merger of each constituent other business entity attached, which officers’ certificates and certificates of merger shall conform to the requirements of subdivision (g).

If one or more domestic other business entities is a disappearing party in a merger pursuant to this subdivision in which a foreign other business entity is the surviving entity, a certificate of merger required by the laws under which each domestic other business entity is organized, including subdivision (a) of Section 15911.14, subdivision (b) of Section 16915 or subdivision (a) of Section 17710.14, if applicable, shall also be filed at the same time as the filing of the agreement of merger.

(4) If the date of the filing in this state pursuant to this subdivision is more than six months after the time of the effectiveness in the foreign jurisdiction, or if the powers of a domestic disappearing corporation are suspended at the time of effectiveness in the foreign jurisdiction, the merger shall be effective
 as to the domestic disappearing corporation as of the date of filing in this state.

(5) Each foreign disappearing corporation that is qualified for the transaction of intrastate business shall automatically by the filing pursuant to subdivision (g) surrender its right to transact intrastate business as of the date of filing in this state or, if later, the effective date of the merger. With respect to each foreign disappearing other business entity previously registered for the transaction of intrastate business in this state, the filing of the agreement of merger pursuant to subdivision (g) automatically has the effect of a cancellation of registration for that foreign other business entity without the necessity of the filing of a certificate of cancellation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 13.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Effect of Merger [12550. - 12552.]

12550.

(a) Upon merger pursuant to this chapter the separate existences of the disappearing parties to the merger cease and the surviving party to the merger shall succeed, without other transfer, to all the rights and property of each of the disappearing parties to the merger and shall be subject to all the debts and liabilities of each and trust obligations upon the property of a disappearing party in the same manner as if incurred by the surviving party to the merger.

(b) All rights of creditors and all liens and trusts upon or arising from the property of each of the constituent corporations and other parties to the merger shall be preserved unimpaired, provided that these liens and trust obligations upon property of a disappearing party shall be limited to the property affected thereby immediately prior to the time the merger is effective.

(c) Any action or proceeding pending by or against any disappearing corporation or other party to the merger may be prosecuted to judgment, which shall bind the surviving party to the merger, or the surviving party to the merger may be proceeded against or substituted in its place.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 437, Sec. 25.2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

12550.5.

(a) Upon merger pursuant to this chapter, a surviving domestic or foreign corporation or other business entity shall be deemed to have assumed the liability of each disappearing domestic or foreign corporation or other business entity that is taxed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) of, or under Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) of, Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code for the following:

(1) To prepare and file, or to cause to be prepared and filed, tax and information returns otherwise required of that disappearing entity as specified in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 18501) of Part 10.2 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(2) To pay any tax liability determined to be due.
